Utah statutes.
31A-22-407.   Reinstatement.
(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), life insurance policies, other
than group policies, shall be reinstated upon written application made within
three years, or within two years in the case of policies with face amounts
under $5,000, from the date of premium default. The applicant shall produce
evidence of insurability satisfactory to the insurer, pay all premiums in
arrears, and pay or reinstate any other indebtedness to the insurer upon the
policy, all with interest, compounded annually, at a rate not exceeding the
rate set by the policy for policy loans compounded annually.  If no rate is
set in the policy, the commissioner shall adopt a rule which sets the rate the
same as under Section 31A-22-402.
(2)  Subsection (1) does not apply if any of these conditions exist:
(a)  The policy has been surrendered for its cash surrender value.
(b)  The policy's cash surrender value has been exhausted.
(c)  The paid-up term insurance, if any, has expired.
